Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2057XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 179 Section 1. Section 483A.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. a. As used in this subsection: 3 (1) âFamily memberâ means a person who is a parent, 4 stepparent, child, stepchild, sibling, stepsibling, 5 grandparent, grandchild, or spouse. 6 (2) âParty huntingâ means the practice of more than one 7 hunter sharing the total number of tags possessed by the 8 hunters and allowing any hunter to use any tag on any deer 9 taken by a member of the party. 10 (3) âResidentâ means a person who has applied for and 11 received deer hunting licenses under section 483A.24, 12 subsection 2, paragraph âcâ . 13 b. Notwithstanding subsection 3, a nonresident who is a 14 family member of a resident may purchase a special nonresident 15 family member deer hunting license for a fee that is one-half 16 the fee for a nonresident deer hunting license established by 17 rule pursuant to section 483A.1. A nonresident may only use a 18 nonresident family member deer hunting license while hunting 19 with a resident who is a family member of the nonresident 20 on the property for which the resident received deer hunting 21 licenses under section 483A.24, subsection 2, paragraph 22 âcâ . A person using a nonresident family member deer hunting 23 license is entitled to the same privileges as a person using 24 a resident deer hunting license, including party hunting, and 25 the nonresident family member deer hunting license shall not 26 be subject to quotas or requirements imposed on nonresidents, 27 except that a person issued a license under this subsection is 28 required to purchase an annual nonresident hunting license. 29